Georgia statutes. TITLE 2 Agriculture
Article 2 Soil and Water Conservation Districts
2-6-37.
Land use regulations — Provisions authorized; uniformity required; availability of copies.

The regulations to be adopted by the supervisors under this article may include:

Provisions requiring the carrying out of necessary engineering operations, including the construction of terraces, terrace outlets, check dams, dikes, ponds, ditches, and other necessary structures, having due regard to the legislative findings set forth in Code Section 2-6-21;

Provisions requiring the observance of particular methods of cultivation, including: contour cultivating; contour furrowing; lister furrowing; sowing; planting; strip cropping, changes in cropping systems, seeding, and planting of lands to water-conserving and erosion-preventing plants, trees, and grasses; forestation; and reforestation; having due regard to the legislative findings set forth in Code Section 2-6-21; and

Provisions requiring the retirement from cultivation of highly erosive areas or of areas on which erosion may not be adequately controlled if cultivation is carried on, having due regard to the legislative findings set forth in Code Section 2-6-21.

The regulations shall be uniform throughout the territory within the district, provided that the supervisors may classify the lands within the district with reference to such factors as soil type, degree of slope, degree of erosion threatened or existing, cropping and tillage practices in use, and other relevant factors and may provide regulations varying with the type or class of land affected but uniform as to all lands within each class or type.

Copies of land use regulations adopted under this article shall be printed and made available to all owners and occupiers of lands lying within the district.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 377, § 9.

2-6-38.
Land use regulations — Binding effect.

Land use regulations adopted pursuant to Code Sections 2-6-35 and 2-6-36 by the supervisors of any district shall be binding and obligatory upon all owners and occupiers of land within such districts.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 377, § 9.

2-6-39.
Land use regulations — Inspections to determine observance; petition; judicial proceedings; costs and expenses.

The supervisors shall have authority to go upon any lands within the district to determine whether land use regulations adopted under this article are being observed.

Where the supervisors of any district find that any of the provisions of land use regulations adopted in accordance with this article are not being observed on particular lands and that such nonobservance tends to increase erosion on such lands and is interfering with the prevention or control of erosion on other lands within the district, the supervisors may present a petition to the superior court of the county or counties within which the lands of the defendant lie. The petition shall set forth the adoption of the land use regulations, the failure of the defendant landowner or occupier of the land to observe such regulations and to perform particular work, operations, or avoidances as required thereby, and that such nonobservance tends to increase erosion on such lands and is interfering with the prevention or control of erosion on other lands within the district. It shall ask the court to require the defendant to perform the work, operations, or avoidances within a reasonable time and to order that if the defendant fails to do so, the supervisors may go on the land, perform the work or other operations or otherwise bring the condition of the land into conformity with the requirements of such regulations, and recover the costs and expenses thereof, with interest, from the owner or occupier of such land.

Upon the presentation of the petition, the court shall cause process to be issued against the defendant and shall hear the case. If it appears to the court that testimony is necessary for the proper disposition of the matter, it may take evidence or appoint a referee to take such evidence as it may direct and report the same to the court with his findings of fact and conclusions of law, which report shall constitute a part of the proceedings upon which the determination of the court shall be made. The court may dismiss the petition or it may require the defendant to perform the work, operations, or avoidances and may provide that upon the failure of the defendant to initiate such performance within the time specified in the order of the court and to prosecute the same to completion with reasonable diligence, the supervisors may enter upon the land involved, perform the work or operations or otherwise bring the conditions of the land into conformity with the requirements of the regulations, and recover the costs and expenses thereof, with interest at the rate of 5 percent per annum, from the owner or occupier of such land.

The court shall retain jurisdiction of the case until after the work has been completed. Upon completion of the work by the supervisors pursuant to the order of the court, the supervisors may file a petition with the court, a copy of which shall be served upon the defendant in the case, stating the costs and expenses sustained by them in the performance of the work and seeking judgment therefor with interest. The court shall have jurisdiction to enter judgment for the amount of such costs and expenses, with interest at the rate of 5 percent per annum until paid, together with the costs of the action, including a reasonable attorney’s fee to be fixed by the court.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 377, § 10.

2-6-40.
Land use regulations — Amendment or repeal.

Any owner of land within a district may at any time file a petition with the supervisors asking that any or all of the land use regulations adopted by the supervisors under Code Sections 2-6-35 and 2-6-36 be amended, supplemented, or repealed.

Such land use regulations shall not be amended, supplemented, or repealed except in accordance with the procedure prescribed in Code Section 2-6-36 for adoption of land use regulations.

Referenda on adoption, amendment, supplementation, or repeal of land use regulations shall not be held more often than once in six months.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 377, § 9.

2-6-41.
Right of eminent domain for small watershed project; conditions precedent; procedure.

When a small watershed project is instituted under the sponsorship of a duly constituted district alone or under cosponsorship with any political subdivision of this state and is approved by the state and federal governments for construction thereof, and when, as a condition precedent to the exercise of the rights conferred in this Code section, 90 percent or more of the separate property owners have gratuitously given in writing and delivered to such district the necessary easements and land rights, for the purpose of the small watershed project, and when the governing board of the district finds that it cannot acquire by voluntary contract the remaining necessary easements and land rights, the sponsoring district, upon such showing incorporated in a condemnation proceeding, is granted the right of eminent domain for the purpose of acquiring the remaining necessary easements and land rights to enable it to accomplish the completion of the small watershed project.

Upon compliance with the conditions precedent set forth in subsection (a) of this Code section, a district may proceed to condemn such land in accordance with the procedure set forth by Code Sections 22-2-130 through 22-2-142 and other pertinent eminent domain statutes to acquire the remaining easements and land rights necessary. In any such proceeding, the condemnor shall be required to condemn the fee simple title to all land not otherwise acquired which will be covered by permanent ponding or permanent flooding. The condemnor shall tender to the condemnee the full sum awarded in the condemnation proceedings or shall pay the same into court, in the event of the refusal of the condemnee to accept the same, before entering upon, occupying, or subjecting to its use, by flooding or otherwise, any part of the lands or rights in land sought to be condemned.

History.

Ga. L. 1960, p. 973, §§ 1, 2.

Cross references.

Condemnation proceedings before assessors, §

22-2-1

et seq.

Condemnation proceedings before special master, §

22-2-100

et seq.

Authority of counties to exercise power of eminent domain for construction and operation of watershed projects, flood-control projects and other projects, §

22-3-100

et seq.

2-6-42.
Cooperation between districts.

The supervisors of any two or more districts may cooperate with one another in the exercise of any or all powers conferred in this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 377, § 11.

2-6-43.
State agencies to cooperate with districts and observe land use regulations.

Agencies of this state which have jurisdiction over or are charged with the administration of any state-owned lands lying within the boundaries of any district and agencies of any county or other governmental subdivision of the state which have jurisdiction over or are charged with the administration of any county-owned or other publicly owned lands lying within the boundaries of any such district shall cooperate to the fullest extent with the supervisors of such districts in the effectuation of programs and operations undertaken by the supervisors under this article. The supervisors of such districts shall be given free access to enter and perform work upon such publicly owned lands. The provisions of land use regulations adopted pursuant to Code Sections 2-6-35 through 2-6-38 shall be in all respects observed by the agencies administering such publicly owned lands.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 377, § 12.

Cross references.

Authority of State Properties Commission to grant revocable licenses to persons to have access to property under custody and control of commission, §

50-16-42

.

2-6-44.
Exemption from taxation.

The property and property rights of every kind and nature acquired in the name of the State of Georgia by any district shall be exempt from state, county, and other taxation.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 377, § 8.

2-6-45.
Discontinuance of district — Petition of landowners; hearings.

Following the expiration of five years from the organization of a district, any 25 owners of land lying within the boundaries of such district may file a petition with the commission seeking to have the operations of the district terminated and the existence of the district discontinued. The commission may conduct such public meetings and public hearings upon the petition as may be necessary to assist it in the consideration thereof.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 377, § 13; Ga. L. 1988, p. 269, § 14.

2-6-46.
Discontinuance of district — Referendum.

Within 60 days after a petition has been received by the commission, it shall hold a referendum on the issue. The commission shall give due notice of the holding of the referendum, shall supervise such referendum, and shall issue appropriate regulations governing the conduct thereof. The question shall be submitted by ballots, upon which the words:

Click to view

shall appear, with directions that all persons desiring to vote for termination of the district shall vote “Yes” and all persons desiring to vote against termination of the district shall vote “No.”

All owners of lands lying within the boundaries of the district, and only such landowners, shall be eligible to vote in the referendum.

No informalities in the conduct of the referendum or in any matters relating thereto shall invalidate the referendum or the result thereof, if notice thereof was given substantially as provided in this Code section and if the referendum was conducted fairly.

“[ ] YES Shall the existence of the (name of
[ ] NO district) be terminated?”

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 377, § 13; Ga. L. 1988, p. 269, § 15.

2-6-47.
Discontinuance of district — Publication of referendum results; determination of feasibility of continuance.

The commission shall publish the result of the referendum. It shall consider and determine whether the continued operation of the district within the defined boundaries is administratively practicable and feasible. If the commission determines that the continued operation of such district is administratively practicable and feasible, it shall record such determination and deny the petition; provided, however, that the commission shall not have the authority to determine that the continued operation of the district is administratively practicable and feasible unless at least a majority of the votes cast in the referendum were cast in favor of the continuance of such district. If the commission determines that the continued operation of such district is not administratively practicable and feasible, it shall record such determination and shall certify such determination to the supervisors of the district. In making its determination, the commission shall give due regard and weight to the attitudes of the owners and occupiers of lands lying within the district, the number of landowners eligible to vote in such referendum who voted, the proportion of the votes cast in such referendum in favor of the discontinuance of the district to the total number of votes cast, the approximate wealth and income of the landowners and occupiers of land of the district, the probable expense of carrying on erosion control operations within such district, and such other economic and social factors as may be relevant to such determination, having due regard to the legislative findings set forth in Code Section 2-6-21.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 377, § 13; Ga. L. 1988, p. 269, § 16.

2-6-48.
Discontinuance of district — Certification from committee; termination of affairs; application for dissolution; certificate of dissolution.

Upon receipt from the commission of a certification that the commission has determined that the continued operation of the district is not administratively practicable and feasible, the supervisors shall proceed forthwith to terminate the affairs of the district. The supervisors shall dispose of all property belonging to the district at public auction and shall pay the proceeds of such sale into the state treasury.

The supervisors shall thereupon file an application, duly verified, with the Secretary of State for the discontinuance of such district and shall transmit with such application the certificate of the commission setting forth the determination of the commission that the continued operation of such district is not administratively practicable and feasible. The application shall recite that the property of the district has been disposed of and that the proceeds were paid as provided in this Code section and shall set forth a full accounting of such properties and of the proceeds of the sale.

The Secretary of State shall issue a certificate of dissolution to the supervisors and shall record such certificate in an appropriate book of record in his office.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 377, § 13; Ga. L. 1988, p. 269, § 17.

2-6-49.
Discontinuance of district — Effect of dissolution.

Upon issuance of a certificate of dissolution under Code Section 2-6-48, all land use regulations theretofore adopted by a district and in force therein shall be of no further force and effect.

All contracts entered into prior to the dissolution of a district, to which the district or supervisors are parties, shall remain in force and effect for the period provided in such contracts. The commission shall be substituted for the district or supervisors as party to such contracts. The commission shall be entitled to all benefits and subject to all liabilities under such contracts and shall have the same rights and liability to perform, to require performance, and to modify or terminate such contracts by mutual consent or otherwise as the supervisors of the district would have had.

Such dissolution shall not affect the lien of any judgment entered under Code Section 2-6-39 nor the pendency of any action instituted under such Code section. The commission shall succeed to all the rights and obligations of the district or supervisors as to such liens and actions.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 377, § 13; Ga. L. 1988, p. 269, § 18.

2-6-50.
Discontinuance of district — Frequency of discontinuance attempts.

The commission shall not be required to entertain petitions for the discontinuance of any district, to conduct referenda upon such petitions, or to make determinations pursuant to such petitions more often than once in five years.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 377, § 13; Ga. L. 1988, p. 269, § 19.

2-6-51.
District not liable for loss, damage, injury, or death.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no district shall have any liability for loss, damage, injury, or death resulting from the location of structures or dwellings on state owned or controlled property in violation of properly recorded easements when all legal recourse to remove such structures or dwellings has been exhausted and property rights in favor of the person infringing upon the easement have been upheld on a final judgment with no appeal or review pending. The provisions of this section shall only apply to soil and water conservation districts and their easements.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-6-51

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 420, § 1.

2-6-52.
Creation of Agricultural Water Conservation Incentive Program; purpose; participation; funding.

There is created the Agricultural Water Conservation Incentive Program. The program shall be developed, implemented, and supervised by the State Soil and Water Conservation Commission.

The purpose of the program shall be to provide incentives to agricultural producers to foster water conservation and enhance water quality.

Participation in the program shall be voluntary.

The program shall include all 159 counties and 40 soil and water conservation districts.

Priority designations for inclusion in the program shall be under the authority of the State Soil and Water Conservation Commission.

Areas shall be included in the program as the funds are appropriated and the technical assistance becomes available from the local soil and water conservation district or the State Soil and Water Conservation Commission.

Funding may be provided to assist practices including but not limited to diversions, filter strips, fencing along streams, field borders, alternative watering systems, critical area plantings, grassed waterways, terraces, surface-water retention structures, heavy-use areas, closures of farm animal manure lagoons, riparian buffers or equivalent controls, animal manure waste systems and application, manure stack houses and other manure-holding structures, irrigation system enhancements, and other projects that foster water conservation and enhance water quality.

Priority designation for inclusion in this program for state funding shall be given to projects that foster water conservation and enhance water quality. To be eligible for cost share funds under this Code section, a project shall be evaluated before funding is awarded and after the project is completed to determine the impact on water quality.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-6-52

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 341, § 1.